District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

19-304

When surviving spouse entitled to one-half.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 698, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 805(c), 48 DCR 2087

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 19-304.
1973 Ed., § 19-304.